Illinois, session 104th, SB268.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding Article XLVIII as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/Art. XLVIII heading new)7ARTICLE XLVIII. INSURANCE RATE FAIRNESS AND CONSUMER 8PROTECTION 9    (215 ILCS 5/1801 new)10    Sec. 1801. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 11Insurance Rate Fairness and Consumer Protection Law. 12    (215 ILCS 5/1805 new)13    Sec. 1805. Purpose. The purpose of this Law is to limit 14unjustified increases in homeowners and automobile insurance 15premiums, ensure transparency in rate-setting practices, and 16grant the Department of Insurance greater oversight authority 17to protect consumers. 18    (215 ILCS 5/1810 new)19    Sec. 1810. Definitions. As used in this Law:20    "Department" means the Department of Insurance.  SB0268- 2 -LRB104 08773 BAB 18827 b1    "Director" means the Director of Insurance.2    "Insurer" means an insurance company offering homeowners 3insurance policies or automobile insurance policies within the 4State. 5    (215 ILCS 5/1815 new)6    Sec. 1815. Prior approval requirement for rate changes.7    (a) Insurers must submit a request for approval to the 8Department for any proposed rate increase for homeowners 9insurance premiums or automobile insurance premiums.10    (b) The Department shall review the rate request within 60 11days after submission.12    (c) If the Department does not make a determination within 13the 60-day review period, the request shall be deemed denied 14until further review.15    (d) Insurers shall not implement any rate increase without 16prior written approval from the Department.17    (e) An insurer that submits false or misleading 18information in a rate request shall be subject to an immediate 19penalty of $100,000 per offense and mandatory audits by the 20Department for the next 3 years.21    (f) This Section is operative on and after January 1, 222026.  23    (215 ILCS 5/1820 new)24    Sec. 1820. Limitation on nondriving factors in automobile   SB0268- 3 -LRB104 08773 BAB 18827 b1insurance rate setting. 2    (a) Insurers are prohibited from using nondriving factors, 3such as credit score, occupation, and education level, to 4determine automobile insurance premiums.5    (b) For homeowners insurance, factors unrelated to the 6insured property's location, age, and condition shall not be 7considered in rate setting.8    (c) The Department may impose civil penalties of up to 9$50,000 per violation on insurers that fail to comply with 10this Section. 11    (215 ILCS 5/1825 new)12    Sec. 1825. Public disclosure and comment period. 13    (a) For any proposed rate increase exceeding 10% in a 1412-month period, the insurer must publish a public notice, 15including a detailed justification for the increase.16    (b) A 30-day public comment period shall follow the 17publication of the notice, during which consumers may submit 18comments or objections to the proposed rate increase.19    (c) The Department shall consider public feedback when 20making a final determination regarding the proposed rate 21increase.22    (d) Failure to publish the notice shall result in 23automatic denial of the rate increase and a fine of $250,000. 24    (215 ILCS 5/1830 new)  SB0268- 4 -LRB104 08773 BAB 18827 b1    Sec. 1830. Rate increase limitations. 2    (a) No insurer shall increase premiums by more than 15% 3per year for any policyholder without exceptional 4justification.5    (b) Exceptional justification must include evidence of 6increased claims related to natural disasters, regulatory 7changes, or unforeseen market shifts.8    (c) The Department shall have sole discretion to determine 9whether the exceptional justification is valid.10    (d) Unauthorized increases exceeding the limitation on 11premium increases under subsection (a) shall result in: (1) 12the insurer fully reimbursing affected policyholders plus 25% 13of the reimbursement amount; and (2) a fine of $500,000. 14    (215 ILCS 5/1835 new)15    Sec. 1835. Regular market conduct examinations. 16    (a) The Department shall conduct market conduct 17examinations of insurers at least once every 3 years to ensure 18compliance with this Law.19    (b) Examinations shall assess the fairness of rate-setting 20practices, transparency of filings, and adherence to approved 21rates.22    (c) The Department may issue corrective actions, fines, or 23sanctions for violations discovered during market conduct 24examinations.25    (d) Insurers found in repeated noncompliance of this law   SB0268- 5 -LRB104 08773 BAB 18827 b1shall be fined $1,000,000 and may have their license to 2operate suspended for up to 12 months. 3    (215 ILCS 5/1840 new)4    Sec. 1840. Penalties and enforcement. 5    (a) Insurers that implement unapproved rate increases or 6fail to comply with this Law shall be subject to fines up to 7$250,000 per violation.8    (b) In cases of repeated violations of this Law, the 9Department may suspend or revoke an insurer's license to 10operate in Illinois.11    (c) Policyholders affected by unapproved rate increases 12shall be entitled to reimbursement of any overpaid premiums 13plus an additional 30% penalty paid by the insurer. 14    (215 ILCS 5/1845 new)15    Sec. 1845. Rulemaking authority. The Department may adopt 16rules necessary to implement and enforce the requirements of 17this Law. 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.